Utah statutes.
34-47-201.   Creation.

(1) (a)  There is created within the commission the Worker Classification Coordinated Enforcement Council consisting of the following four members:

(i)  the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;

(ii)  the executive director of the Department of Commerce, or the executive director's designee;

(iii)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services, or the executive director's designee; and

(iv)  the chair of the State Tax Commission, or the chair's designee.

(b)  The Office of the Attorney General shall work cooperatively with the council.

(2)  The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, is chair of the council.

(3) (a)  A majority of the council members constitutes a quorum.

(b)  A vote of the majority of the council members present when a quorum is present is an action of the council.

(c)  Subject to Section 34-47-202, the council shall meet at the call of the chair, except that the chair shall call a meeting at least quarterly.

(d)  The council may adopt additional procedures or requirements for:

(i)  voting, when there is a tie of the council members;

(ii)  how meetings are to be called; and

(iii)  the frequency of meetings.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 2011 General Session

